Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
89E]

SEPARATION
BENEFITS

Section

89E-1 Definitions

89E-2 Voluntary severance benefit

89E-3 Special retirement benefit

89E-4 Restrictions

89E-5 Reemployment

89E-6 Payments; lapse of unexpended funds

89E-7 Reporting requirements; reduction in
personnel counts

89E-8 Guidelines; development and administration

89E-9 Matching funds

89E-10 Review by employee

Note

Chapter applies to Hawaii health systems corporation
employees separated from service as a consequence of L 2015, c 103. L Sp 2016
2d, c 1, §5.

State contributions; Hawaii health systems corporation
employees hired after June 30, 1996, and retired. L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, §3.

Cross References

Hawaii health systems corporation; public-private partnerships
for the delivery of health care services at Maui regional system facilities,
see chapter 323F, part IV.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next